Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 3

Contempt on Failure to Appear

21-1-301. Procedure on defendant's failure to appear.

If the defendant upon whom process has been served fails to appear and defend in the time required by law, the bill may be taken for confessed; or the complainant may proceed by process of contempt to compel an answer.

Code 1858, § 4360 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 15); Shan., § 6170; Code 1932, § 10441; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-301.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, §§ 29-9-101 — 29-9-106.

Decrees pro confesso, title 21, ch. 1, part 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 140, 178.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538.

21-1-302. Attachments.

The only process of contempt is an attachment, which is issued upon order of the chancellor at the instance of the complainant, upon the return of the subpoena duly served by the proper officer, or affidavit by the officer of such service.

The attachment may be made returnable to any rule day in term or vacation, and upon its service, bail may be taken for the appearance of the defendant at the time fixed in the attachment.

If the defendant fails to appear in compliance with the terms of the defendant's bail, a second attachment issues, upon which no bail can be taken, and the penalty of the bail bond may be decreed forfeited and collected by execution.

After an attachment for contempt, no plea or demurrer shall be received, unless by order of the court upon motion.

Code 1858, §§ 4361-4363, 4365 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, §§ 9, 10, 19, 21); Shan., §§ 6171-6173, 6175; Code 1932, §§ 10442-10444, 10446; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 21-302 — 21-305.

Cross-References. Rule days, § 21-1-705.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 155, 157.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 27.

Collateral References. 17 C.J.S. Contempt § 78.

Contempt
55, 56.

21-1-303. Refusal to answer fully.

A defendant who appears and refuses to answer fully shall be committed to jail, there to remain until the defendant is purged of the contempt and complies with the requirements of the law by filing a full and complete answer.

Code 1858, § 4364 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 15); Shan., § 6174; Code 1932, § 10445; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-306.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 155, 157, 158.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538.

Collateral References. Contempt
58, 64.

21-1-304. Procedure after commitment.

If the defendant is committed for contempt, the complainant may proceed with the action as if the bill had been taken for confessed, the allegations being taken as in all respects true. But, in that case, all further proceedings for the contempt shall cease, and the court, or the judge of the court, may discharge the defendant from custody.

Code 1858, §§ 4366, 4367 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, §§ 15, 20); Shan., §§ 6176, 6177; Code 1932, §§ 10447, 10448; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-307.

Cross-References. Decrees pro confesso, title 21, ch. 1, part 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 157.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538.

21-1-305. Extension of time to answer.

Nothing in this part shall deprive the clerk and master, or the court, of the power of granting to the defendant, upon good cause shown, further time within which to file answer.

Code 1858, § 4368 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 15); Shan., § 6178; Code 1932, § 10449; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-308.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 157, 634.